test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-piqn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - piʼņ: # Noun 64 'eng /est koer/fin' - full paradigm
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Nom: [piʼņ, piņ]
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Gen: [piʼņ, piņ]
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Par: [piʼņņõ, piņņõ]
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Dat: [piʼņņõn, piņņõn]
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Ins: [piʼņkõks, piņkõks]
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Ill: [piʼņņõ, piņņõ]
     piʼņ+N+Sg+Ela: [piʼņštõ, piņštõ]
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Nom: piņīd
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Gen: piņīd
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Par: piņīdi
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Dat: piņīdõn
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Ins: piņīdõks
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Ill: piņīž
     piʼņ+N+Pl+Ela: piņīst
